Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-418
Hospice or hospice service, defined.

Hospice or hospice service means a person or any legal entity which provides home care, palliative care, or other supportive services to terminally ill persons and their families.

Laws 2000, LB 819, § 18.